Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Chapter 9. Employer’s Liability and Workers’ Compensation
§ 659.
Giving of notice and making of claim.

A notice under the provisions of this chapter shall be given to the employer, or, if the employer is a partnership, then to any one of the partners.
If the employer is a corporation, then the notice may be given to any agent of the corporation upon whom process may be served, or to any officer of the corporation, or any agent in charge of the business at the place where the injury occurred.
Such notice shall be given by delivering it or by sending it by mail by registered letter addressed to the employer at his, her, or its last known residence or place of business.
The foregoing provisions shall apply to the making of a claim.

§ 660.
Sufficiency of notice of injury.

A notice given under the provisions of this chapter shall not be held invalid or insufficient by reason of any inaccuracy in stating the time, place, nature, or cause of the injury, or otherwise, unless it is shown that the employer was in fact misled to the injury as a result of the inaccuracy. Want of or delay in giving notice, or in making a claim, shall not be a bar to proceedings under the provisions of this chapter, if it is shown that the employer, the employer’s agent, or representative had knowledge of the accident or that the employer has not been prejudiced by the delay or want of notice. Proceedings to initiate a claim for a work-related injury pursuant to this chapter may not be commenced after three years from the date of injury. This section shall not be construed to limit subsequent claims for benefits stemming from a timely filed work-related injury claim.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a claim for occupational disease shall be made within two years of the date the occupational disease is reasonably discoverable and apparent.

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

1999, No. 41

, § 6;

2003, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. May 26, 2004.

§ 660a.
Electronic filing of reports of injury.

For the purposes of this section:

“Electronic data interchange” or “EDI technology” means the computer-to-computer exchange of business transactions in the standardized structured electronic format.

“Implementation plan” means the written document prepared by an insurance carrier specifying a timetable for reporting by EDI.

“Reporter” means the insurer who is responsible for reporting injuries to the Department.

When an insurance carrier uses electronic data interchange processes and technology, the level of record detail in the report shall be equivalent to that required in a written paper record.

Each insurance carrier shall transmit data elements by electronic data interchange to the Department by the dates specified in this section. An insurance carrier shall provide complete, valid, accurate data for the data as required by this section. Each electronic transmission of data shall include appropriate header and trailer records.

In order to begin EDI reporting, an insurance carrier shall submit to the Commissioner an implementation plan pursuant to rules adopted by the Department.

No later than July 1, 2004, all first reports of injury shall be filed by the insurance carrier electronically. The Commissioner may grant an insurance carrier a variance if the insurance carrier documents to the satisfaction of the Commissioner that compliance would cause the insurance carrier “undue hardship,” which, for the purposes of this section, means significant difficulty or expense.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 105

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 15, 2002.

§ 661.
Limitation of time as regards minors and persons with a mental condition or psychiatric disability.

Limitation of time provided by this chapter shall not run as against any person who is incompetent or a minor dependent so long as such person has no guardian.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 138.

§ 662.
Agreements; required payments in absence of.

If the employer and an injured employee or the dependents of a deceased employee enter into an agreement in regard to compensation payable under the provisions of this chapter, a memorandum thereof shall be filed with the Commissioner. If approved by the Commissioner, such agreement shall be enforceable and subject to modification as provided by sections 668 and 675 of this title. The Commissioner shall approve such an agreement only when the terms thereof conform to the provisions of this chapter. However, a compromise agreement may be approved by the Commissioner when he or she is clearly of the opinion that the best interests of such employee or such dependents will be served thereby. A compromise settlement during pendency of an appeal to Superior Court or to Supreme Court shall be effective only with the approval of the Commissioner in accordance with this section.

In the absence of an agreement pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the employer or insurance carrier shall notify the Commissioner and the employee in writing that the claim is denied and the reasons therefor. Upon the employee’s application for a hearing under section 663 of this title, within 60 days, the Commissioner shall review the evidence upon which denial is based and if the evidence does not reasonably support the denial, the Commissioner shall order that payments be made until a hearing is held and a decision is rendered. Payments pursuant to this subsection shall not be deemed an admission of liability by the employer nor shall such payments preclude subsequent agreement under subsection (a) of this section or prejudice the rights of either party to hearing or appeal under this chapter. If the Commissioner’s decision, after a hearing, is that the employee was not entitled to any or all benefits paid between the initial denial and the final decision, upon request of the employer, the Commissioner may order that the employee repay all benefits to which the employee was not entitled. The employer may enforce such a repayment order in any court of law having jurisdiction of the amount involved. Nothing in this section shall require the Commissioner to order payments pending a hearing if the Commissioner concludes that the benefit at issue is not compensable regardless of the lack of evidence supporting the denial. For the purposes of this section, any written communication by an unrepresented claimant that questions the denial of any benefit shall be deemed to be an application for hearing under section 663 of this title.

Whenever payment of a compensable claim is refused, on the basis that another employer or insurer is liable, the Commissioner, after notice to interested parties and a review of the claim, but in no event later than 30 days, shall order that payments be made by one employer or insurer until a hearing is held and a decision is rendered. For the purposes of this review, the employer or insurer at the time of the most recent personal injury for which the employee claims benefits shall be presumed to be the liable employer or insurer and shall have the burden of proving another employer’s or insurer’s liability. Payments pursuant to this subsection shall not be deemed an admission or conclusive finding of an employer’s or insurer’s liability nor shall payments preclude subsequent agreement under subsection (a) of this section or prejudice the rights of either party to a hearing or appeal under this chapter.

Where more than one employer or insurer may be liable for an employee’s occupational disease, the employer in whose service the employee was last injuriously exposed to the hazard that caused the disease, and the insurance carrier, if any, on the risk when the employee was last exposed, shall be liable if it can be proven that the service for the last employer causally contributed to the disease.

In any dispute between employers and insurers arising under subsection (c) or (d) of this section, after payment to the claimant, the Commissioner may order that the dispute be resolved through arbitration rather than the formal hearing process under sections 663 and 664 of this title. Qualifications for arbitrators and standards for the arbitration process shall be established by the Commissioner by rule. If arbitration is ordered, the process shall proceed as follows:

The parties shall select an arbitrator from a list provided by the Commissioner.

The arbitrator shall:

Determine apportionment of the liability for the claim, including costs and attorney’s fees, among the respective employers or insurers, or both. The apportionment may be limited to one or more parties. If the parties do not agree, the costs of arbitration may be apportioned among the parties by the arbitrator.

Issue a written decision which shall be final.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1981, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

1983, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), eff. April 20, 1984;

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 10a;

1999, No. 41

, § 7;

1999, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2005, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. May 29, 2006.

§ 663.
Hearings, where held; decision.

If the compensation is not fixed by agreement, either party may apply to the Commissioner for hearing and award in the premises who shall set a time and place for hearing and give at least six days’ notice thereof to the parties. The hearing shall be held at a place designated by the Commissioner. No proposed findings of fact shall be required from the parties unless ordered by the Commissioner. If ordered, the proposed findings of fact shall be submitted within 30 days after conclusion of the hearing.

The decision may include abbreviated findings of fact or conclusions of law, or both, when appropriate.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10;

1977, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. May 3, 1978;

2007, No. 208

(Adj. Sess.), § 11.

§ 663a.
Workers’ compensation dispute mediation.

The Commissioner shall require mediation in certain workers’ compensation disputes. In each case, after a request for formal hearing has been filed, in accordance with the rule, the Commissioner may determine whether the disputed issue and the parties are appropriate for mediation prior to a formal hearing and whether mediation would speed resolution of the dispute without the time and expense of a hearing. If the Commissioner determines that mediation is appropriate, the Commissioner shall order the parties to attend at least one mediation session prior to a scheduled hearing. Referring a case to mediation shall not cause a delay in setting a date for the formal hearing. The Commissioner shall, by rule, determine the procedures by which cases are selected and scheduled for mediation.

The costs of mediation shall be divided evenly between the claimant and the employer, unless the parties agree otherwise. The cost of the mediation, up to the amount set by rule, shall be a cost recoverable by the claimant pursuant to section 678 of this title.

The Commissioner shall select or make available a list of qualified individuals to act as mediators, which may include nonattorneys, provided they are experienced in workers’ compensation, including former Department employees and insurance adjusters. The mediators shall be compensated at rates set by rule of the Commissioner.

Prior to implementing this section, the Commissioner shall consult with the Department of Labor Advisory Council established by section 1306 of this title, the workers’ compensation committees of the Vermont Bar Association and the Vermont Trial Lawyers’ Association, representatives of insurers who provide workers’ compensation coverage in Vermont, and with other appropriate parties.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 208

(Adj. Sess.), § 10.

§ 663b.
Fraud.

Any claims of fraud submitted to the Department shall require action by the Commissioner to determine if further investigation is warranted. The Commissioner shall order the insurer to investigate specific allegations of claimant fraud and submit a written report to the Department. Once the insurer’s report is received, the Commissioner shall afford the claimant an opportunity to respond in person or in writing within 30 days. The Commissioner may order additional information to be provided to the Department from the insurer or the claimant. The Department shall issue a determination on the fraud allegation, including penalties and any reimbursement as provided under section 708 of this title. The party may appeal the decision of the Commissioner as provided under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25.

An employee found to have committed fraud in order to receive compensation under this chapter shall be ordered to repay all compensation fraudulently received in addition to other administrative penalties ordered by the Department. These payments shall not be charged to the employer for purposes of calculating its experience rating.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 63, eff. June 24, 2014.

§ 664.
Trial and award.

Within 60 days after a hearing is held, the Commissioner shall make an award supported by findings of fact and the applicable law and shall send a copy of the award to the parties. If the employee prevails at the hearing, the Commissioner’s findings shall include the date on which the employer’s obligation to pay compensation under this chapter began. The award shall include interest at the statutory rate computed from that date on the total amount of unpaid compensation.

HISTORY:

Amended

1997, No. 19

, § 4.

§ 665.
Repealed.
1985, No. 194 (Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 666.
Manner of giving notice of hearing.

Notices of hearings under the provisions of this chapter shall be given to the employee, employer, and to the insurance carrier.
Such notice shall be given by delivering it or by sending it by mail, addressed to the employee, employer, and to such insurance company at his, her, or its last known residence or place of business.
The foregoing provisions shall apply alike to individuals, partnerships, and corporations.

§ 667.
Examination by independent medical examiners.

Whenever it appears that a dispute exists regarding the reasonableness and necessity of treatment for an injury, or regarding the claimant’s ability to perform suitable work, including light duty work, or regarding any other medical issue, the Commissioner may appoint an independent medical examiner to examine the employee and report to the Commissioner. Whenever a dispute exists regarding the nature and extent of any permanent partial impairment which involves permanent partial disability ratings which differ by more than 10 percent, the Commissioner shall appoint an independent medical examiner to examine the employee and report to the Commissioner the examiner’s opinion regarding the nature and extent of any permanent partial impairment. The opinion of the independent medical examiner as to degree of impairment shall be binding on the parties absent a showing of substantial error or omissions fraud or a gross departure from generally accepted medical practices. If a dispute involves permanent partial disability ratings which differ by 10 percent or less, the rating shall be determined by the Commissioner.

A pool of independent medical examiners shall be established to perform independent medical examinations. Representatives of management and labor from the Governor’s Advisory Council on Workers’ Compensation, if available, otherwise other representatives of management and labor shall each submit a list of health care providers as proposed members of the pool. The Commissioner shall select the common names from both lists. If, in the opinion of the Commissioner, the number of independent medical examiners in the pool is not sufficient for any reason, or does not adequately represent a range of health care providers, the Commissioner shall select additional health care providers or request additional names. All health care providers in the pool shall receive training about the nature and purpose of workers’ compensation and shall follow the guidelines developed by rule by the Commissioner. Where a dispute involves a determination of the degree of permanent partial disability, the independent medical examiner shall use the most recent edition of the American Medical Association Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment or the supplement provided by the Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall determine fees to be paid to independent medical examiners for examinations pursuant to subsection 640(d) of this title. The fee shall be paid by the employer in an amount and proportion determined by the Commissioner.

If a claimant fails or refuses to undergo an independent medical examination without good cause, the Commissioner may assess all or a part of the cost of the examination or any missed appointments against the claimant or may suspend payment of compensation to which the claimant may be entitled, or both.

The independent medical examination report shall be admitted into evidence in any Superior Court appellate proceedings concerning the claim. The use of an independent medical examiner under this section shall not limit the right of a claimant to obtain his or her medical examination and report on any disputed medical issue.

If an independent medical examiner is appointed, all parties to the dispute shall immediately provide the examiner with copies of all relevant medical records in their possession and shall assist the examiner in obtaining any other medical records deemed relevant to the proceedings.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 134

, § 4, eff. June 6, 1963;

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 11.

§ 668.
Modification of awards.

Upon the Commissioner’s own motion or upon the application of any party in interest upon the ground of a change in the conditions, or whenever doubts have arisen as to the jurisdiction of the Commissioner at the time the petition was presented, the Commissioner may at any time within six years of the date of award review any award by giving at least six days’ notice thereof to the parties personally, or to the attorneys appearing in the cause. On such review, the Commissioner may make an order ending, diminishing, or increasing the compensation previously awarded, subject to the maximum or minimum provided in this chapter. If it appears that the petition for hearing was presented without previous authority or that for other reason the Commissioner did not have jurisdiction in the cause, the Commissioner may make an order striking off the award, and shall state conclusions of fact and rulings of law and immediately send to the parties a copy of the award. Such a review shall not affect any money already paid.

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 669.
Finality of award.

An award of the Commissioner shall, in the absence of fraud, be conclusive between the parties except as provided in section 668 of this title, unless an appeal is taken therefrom as hereinafter provided.

§ 670.
Appeals to Superior Court.

Within 30 days after copies of an award have been sent as provided by this chapter, either party may appeal to the Superior Court of a county wherein a civil action between the parties would be triable.
Either party shall be entitled to a trial by jury.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 134

, § 5, eff. June 6, 1963;

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 194, eff. March 29, 1972;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 671.
Jurisdiction; findings for new award.

The jurisdiction of such court shall be limited to a review of questions of fact or questions of fact and law certified to it by the Commissioner and upon completion of the case in Superior Court, either after trial or upon remand from the Supreme Court, the clerk shall certify the findings of the court to the Commissioner who shall thereupon make a new order in accordance therewith and shall forthwith send to each of the parties a copy of such order. Such new order shall have all the force and effect of an award made pursuant to the provisions of sections 663 and 664 of this title and shall supersede the award previously made by the Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

2017, No. 74

, § 42.

Form of certification.

Trial court was not required to speculate on meaning and scope of questions certified by Commissioner when such questions were so vague that their meaning and scope could not be determined with certainty, but would order certified questions returned to commissioner to be so amended that questions of fact to be retried might be made definite and certain. Pitts v. Howe Scale Co., 110 Vt. 27, 1 A.2d 695, 1938 Vt. LEXIS 115 (1938).

Appellees’ contention that no questions were certified by Commissioner because matters attempted to be certified were not in interrogative form, was without merit, though certifying in such form would be better practice and would tend to obviate doubt as to exact issues intended to be raised. Pitts v. Howe Scale Co., 110 Vt. 27, 1 A.2d 695, 1938 Vt. LEXIS 115 (1938).

§ 672.
Appeals to the Supreme Court.

If an appeal is not taken under the provisions of section 670 of this title within the time limited therefor, either party may transfer such cause to the Supreme Court.
The jurisdiction of the Court shall be limited to a review of questions of law certified to it by the Commissioner.
On such appeal or on an appeal taken as provided in sections 670 and 671 of this title and coming to the Supreme Court on appeal from Superior Court, the Supreme Court may render final judgment and award execution, or may remand the cause to the Superior Court or to the Commissioner for further findings or for new order by him or her in accordance with the mandate of the Court. The Court shall, by general rules, prescribe the procedure to be followed in case of such appeals.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 673.
Appeal in case of fraud, accident, or mistake.

On petition and proof and in its discretion, the Supreme or Superior Court may grant leave to enter an appeal from an order of the Commissioner of Labor in cases where the petitioner has been prevented by fraud, accident or mistake from taking or entering an appeal within the time allowed by law.
On granting the same, the court shall order such petitioner to give sufficient security to prosecute such appeal to effect and pay such costs as are awarded against him or her.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006.

§ 674.
Service of petition.

Such petition shall not be sustained unless served on the adverse party within 21 days from the date thereof and within two years after the last date upon which such appeal might have been entered in court.

§ 675.
Enforcement of award.

If an award is made under the provisions of this chapter, including interim orders, issued pursuant to sections 643a and 662 of this title, or an agreement is approved by the Commissioner, and the employer or insurance carrier fails to comply with the award or agreement, the employee, subject to the stay provisions of subsection (b) of this section, may proceed to collect all or any part of past due installments in any court of law having jurisdiction of the amount involved. If the employee prevails, interest, reasonable attorney’s fees, and costs shall be allowed.

Any award or order of the Commissioner shall be of full effect from issuance unless stayed by the Commissioner, any appeal notwithstanding. Any request for a stay shall be filed with the Commissioner at the time of filing a notice of appeal. The Commissioner, after allowing the prevailing party 10 days within which to be heard in writing on the request, shall respond within 15 days to the request for stay. The response of the Commissioner shall detail his or her reasons for granting, denying, or modifying the request and shall be a part of the record on appeal. No stay shall exist unless granted pursuant to this subsection.

An employer who fails to make payment due to an employee under this chapter pursuant to an executed agreement under sections 642, 644, 646, or 648 of this title or pursuant to an interim order of the Commissioner within 15 days after the payment is due shall also pay the employee interest on the unpaid compensation at the statutory rate.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1997, No. 19

, § 5.

§ 676.
Revision of decrees.

Upon the filing with it of a certified copy of a decision of the Commissioner ending, diminishing, or increasing compensation previously awarded, a Superior Court which has rendered judgment as provided by this chapter shall revoke or modify its prior judgment so that it will conform to such decision.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 677.
New hearings; when granted; procedure.

The Commissioner may grant a new hearing in a cause determined by him or her on the ground of newly discovered evidence when a petition, setting forth the substance of such evidence, verified by the oath of the petitioner, is presented.
His or her decision in granting or denying such hearing shall be final and conclusive.
If a party petitions the Commissioner for a new hearing, he or she shall give the adverse party notice of such petition by a citation signed by the Commissioner served like a summons at least 12 days before the date of such hearing.
A new hearing shall not be granted on a petition unless the citation to the adverse party is served within six months after the date of the order of the Commissioner.

§ 678.
Costs; attorney’s fees.

Necessary costs of proceedings under this chapter, including deposition expenses, subpoena fees, and expert witness fees, shall be assessed by the Commissioner against the employer or its workers’ compensation carrier when the claimant prevails. The Commissioner may allow the claimant to recover reasonable attorney’s fees when the claimant prevails. Costs shall not be taxed or allowed either party except as provided in this section.

In appeals to the Superior or Supreme Court, if the claimant prevails, he or she shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees as approved by the court, necessary costs, including deposition expenses, subpoena fees, and expert witness fees, and interest at the rate of 12 percent per annum on that portion of any award the payment of which is contested. Interest shall be computed from the date of the award of the Commissioner.

By January 1, 1999, and at least every five years thereafter, the Commissioner shall amend existing rules regarding reasonable attorney’s fees awarded under subsection (a) of this section. In amending these rules, the Commissioner shall consider accessibility to legal services, appropriate inflation factors, and any other related factors consistent with the purposes of this chapter. In the event the Commissioner proposes no change in the rules in any five-year period, the Commissioner shall provide a written report to the Legislative Committee on Administrative Rules of the General Assembly explaining the reasons for not changing the rules.

In cases for which a formal hearing is requested and the case is resolved prior to formal hearing, the Commissioner may award reasonable attorney’s fees if the claimant retained an attorney in response to an actual or effective denial of a claim and thereafter payments were made to the claimant as a result of the attorney’s efforts.

An attorney representing a claimant shall submit a claim for attorney’s fees and costs within 30 days following a decision in which the claimant prevails.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 90

;

1969, No. 237

(Adj. Sess.), eff. May 1, 1970;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1981, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1981, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

1997, No. 140

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2007, No. 208

(Adj. Sess.), § 16, eff. June 11, 2008;

2013, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 66, eff. June 24, 2014.

§ 679.
Fees of sheriffs and witnesses.

Sheriffs and witnesses shall receive the same fees for the service of process and attendance before the Commissioner as are paid sheriffs and witnesses in Superior Court.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 680.
Preferences.

All rights of compensation granted by the provisions of this chapter shall have the same preference or priority against the assets of the employer or the property of any persons described in subsection 687(b) of this title as is allowed by

9 V.S.A. § 1972

.

HISTORY:

Amended

1997, No. 19

, § 6.

§ 681.
Claims not assignable.

Claims for compensation under the provisions of this chapter shall not be assignable.
Compensation and claims therefor shall be exempt from all claims of creditors, except as provided in section 682 of this title.

§ 682.
Liens against compensation.

Claims of physicians and hospitals for services rendered under the provisions of this chapter and claims of attorneys for services rendered an employee in prosecuting a claim under the provisions of this chapter shall be approved by the Commissioner.
When so approved they may be enforced against compensation awards in such manner as the Commissioner may direct.

§§ 683-686.
Repealed. 1999, No. 41, § 8(a)(2).

§ 687.
Security for compensation.

Employers, not including State, county, or municipal bodies, shall secure compensation for their employees in one or more of the following ways:

By insuring and keeping insured the payment of such compensation with any corporation or reciprocal or interinsurance exchange authorized to transact the business of workers’ compensation insurance in this State.

By obtaining and keeping in force guarantee insurance with any company authorized to do such guarantee business within the State.

By establishing and maintaining to the satisfaction of the Commissioner the employer’s financial responsibility necessary to secure payment by the employer of compensation according to the terms of this chapter. The Department of Financial Regulation shall provide technical assistance and a recommendation on each self-insurance application to the Commissioner. For purposes of this subdivision, the Commissioner shall, after consultation with the Commissioner of Financial Regulation, adopt rules and impose terms and conditions, including surety bonds, cash deposits, or reserves and excess risk insurance, as necessary to ensure the same security for compensation as provided under contract for workers’ compensation or guarantee insurance. The fund shall be free from attachment or trustee process so long as any liability for the compensation exists.

By participating to the satisfaction of the Commissioner of Labor in a nonprofit, self-insurance corporation approved by the Commissioner of Financial Regulation under this chapter.

In the event an employer fails to secure workers’ compensation as required by this section and an employee reasonably believes that he or she has received a personal injury by accident arising out of and in course of employment with that employer, then:

If the employer is a corporation, the officers and majority stockholders of the corporation shall be personally liable for any benefits owed to the injured employee under this chapter.

If the employer is a partnership, the partners shall be personally liable for any benefits owed to the injured employee under this chapter.

If the employer is neither a corporation nor a partnership, the principals, executive officers, or controlling parties of the business, or all of these, shall be personally liable for any benefits owed to the injured employee under this chapter.

Upon filing a claim for benefits under this chapter or if the employee elects to bring a civil action pursuant to subsection 618(b) of this title, the employee may obtain a lien against the property of the employer or the personal property of any persons described in subsection (b) of this section.

The remedies provided in this section shall be in addition to any other remedies and penalties available under law.

All insurance carriers authorized to write workers’ compensation insurance coverage in Vermont shall make available, at the written request of the employer, a workers’ compensation insurance rate that contains a deductible provision that binds the employer to reimburse the workers’ compensation insurer for at least the first $500.00 of benefits, medical or indemnity, due to an injured employee. Claims shall be adjusted and paid by the insurer, and the employer shall reimburse the insurer for the amount of the deductible.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 31

, § 4, eff. March 31, 1971;

1981, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1985, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

1989, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 25(b);

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 14, 28a;

1995, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 38(a);

1997, No. 19

, § 7;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2007, No. 208

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2011, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 2, 2012.

§ 687a.
Self-insurance by associations.

Any association which has been in existence in this State for five or more continuous years may establish and maintain a nonprofit corporation to secure workers’ compensation insurance for employees of participating member employers and for employees of the association. The Commissioner of Financial Regulation shall assist with the establishment of a nonprofit corporation organized for the purpose of providing compensation under this chapter.

No association electing to provide workers’ compensation benefits under this chapter shall commence business for the purpose of distributing, sharing, or pooling any workers’ compensation risk until a plan for the operation of the corporation and all contracts, agreements, and any other documents underlying or implementing the plan, and all amendments to those documents, have been approved by the Commissioner of Financial Regulation.

The Commissioner of Financial Regulation shall promptly adopt interim rules to assist in the formation of the nonprofit corporations and to expedite approval of any plan of operation. The Commissioner shall also adopt rules relating to the administration and operation of the nonprofit corporations in order to provide for the fiscal integrity of agreements and to provide that trade, market, and claim practices engaged in by the nonprofit corporations are equitable, fair, and consistent. In adopting these rules, the Commissioner shall recognize that the nonprofit corporations are not for profit; that they are undertaking a service to the association’s participating employers to control excessive workers’ compensation insurance premiums; and that they shall not be considered insurance companies or insurers under the laws of this State. The rules shall be modeled after the rules now in effect for intermunicipal insurance agreements authorized by 24 V.S.A. chapter 121, subchapter 6, and for captive insurance companies chartered under 8 V.S.A. chapter 141.

A nonprofit corporation established under this section:

Shall have as its purposes: reducing the risk of its members; safety inspections; distributing, sharing, and pooling risks; acquiring insurance, excess loss insurance, or reinsurance; and processing, paying, and defending claims of employees of employers who are members of the association.

Shall have the same persons serve as directors who serve as directors of the association.

Shall have the same name as the association with the additional words: “Workers’ Compensation Self-Insurance Corporation.”

May enter into agreements for obtaining or effecting insurance by self-insurance, for obtaining or effecting workers’ compensation insurance from any insurer authorized to transact business in this State as an admitted or surplus lines carrier, or for obtaining and effecting insurance secured in accordance with any other method provided by law, or by combination of the provisions of this section for obtaining and effecting insurance. Agreements made pursuant to this subsection shall provide for pooling of self-insurance reserves, risks, claims and losses, and administrative services and expenses associated with the agreement among participating employers.

Any contributions made to a nonprofit corporation established under this section for the purpose of distributing, sharing, or pooling risks, shall be made on an actuarially sound basis, and the nonprofit corporation shall have its books, records, and financial affairs audited annually. A copy of the annual audit shall be provided to the board of directors of the association or its governing body, to each participating employer, and to the Commissioner of Financial Regulation.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 31; amended

1995, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 38(a);

2011, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 2, 2012.

§ 688.
Administrative penalties; insurance company’s license suspended.

The Commissioner, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, may assess administrative penalties of not more than $5,000.00 against any employer, insurance company, or their agents that the Commissioner finds has refused or neglected to comply with the reasonable rules and regulations of the Commissioner or any orders issued by the Commissioner, or to adjust and pay compensation and medical bills in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

The notice and opportunity for a hearing under this section shall be in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25. The Commissioner shall adopt rules regarding the amount and imposition of penalties.

In addition to assessing administrative penalties, the Commissioner may refer to the Commissioner of Financial Regulation any insurance company authorized to transact workers’ compensation insurance in this State which refuses or neglects to comply with the reasonable rules and regulations of the Commissioner or which neglects or refuses to properly and promptly adjust and pay compensation and medical bills in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. If, after hearing, the Commissioner of Financial Regulation finds that the insurance company has failed to comply with the rules and regulations or orders issued by the Commissioner of Labor or has failed to properly and promptly pay compensation and medical bills as provided by this chapter, the Commissioner of Financial Regulation may take appropriate action against the insurance company as provided in Title 8.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 25(b);

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

1995, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 38(a);

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2011, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 2, 2012.

§ 689.
Employer compelled to insure.

If an employer who secures the payment of compensation under the provisions of subdivision 687(3) of this title neglects or refuses to comply with the reasonable rules and regulations of the Commissioner or neglects and refuses to promptly adjust and pay all compensation and medical bills as required by law, the Commissioner may cite in the employer. If on hearing it is found that such neglect or refusal is willful, the Commissioner may revoke the permission granted to such employer to secure the payment of compensation under such subdivision and compel the employer to take out insurance in an insurance company authorized to transact compensation insurance in the State in addition to penalties assessed under section 688 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 16.